Illinois, session 104th, HB4133.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Government Debt Reform Act is amended 5by changing Section 17.5 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 350/17.5)7    Sec. 17.5. Bond authorization by referendum. 8    (a) Whenever applicable law provides that the 9authorization of or the issuance of bonds is subject to either 10a referendum or backdoor referendum, the approval, once 11obtained, remains (i) for 5 years after the date of the 12referendum or (ii) for 3 years after the end of the petition 13period for a backdoor referendum. However, whenever the 14applicable law provides that the authorization of or the 15issuance of bonds under the Water Pollution Control Loan 16Program or the Public Water Supply Loan Program, under Title 17IV-A of the Environmental Protection Act, is subject to either 18a referendum or backdoor referendum, the approval, once 19obtained, remains (i) for 7 years after the date of the 20referendum or (ii) for 5 years after the end of the petition 21period for a backdoor referendum. In the case of bonds 22authorized to be issued under the Downstate Forest Preserve 23District Act and approved by Lake County voters in a November   HB4133- 2 -LRB104 14599 HLH 27741 b12008 referendum, or in the case of bonds authorized to be 2issued under the School Code and approved by voters of 3Sandoval Community Unit School District 501 in a March 2012 4referendum, or bonds authorized to be issued under the School 5Code and approved by the voters of Iroquois County Community 6Unit School District Number 9 in an April 2021 referendum, the 7approval, once obtained, remains for 10 years after the date 8of the referendum. In the case of bonds authorized to be issued 9under the Counties Code and approved by Jackson County voters 10in a 1994 referendum, of which less than $200,000 of the 11original bonds have been issued, and for which the purpose of 12the bonds is flooding prevention, the approval, once obtained, 13remains for 25 years after the date of the referendum. 14    (b) With respect to any bond approval under subsection 15(a), if, for any reason, the bonds are not issued because of a 16court action, then the time limits set forth under subsection 17(a) for the approval for the bonds is tolled during the time 18that the court action is pending. This subsection (b) applies 19to any bond issuance approved by referendum held on or after 20January 1, 2003 or by a backdoor referendum held on or after 21January 1, 2005. 22(Source: P.A. 98-655, eff. 6-18-14; 99-926, eff. 1-20-17.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.